District of Columbia statutes.
47-2609

Liability for failure to pay tax.

If any such company shall fail to pay the tax herein required, it shall be liable to the District of Columbia for the amount thereof, and in addition thereof a penalty of 8% per month thereafter until paid.

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 676, ch. 690, title II, § 7
renumbered as § 9, Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-113, § 401, 31 DCR 3974
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Insurance department, required annual statement of business from insurance companies, tax payment, annuities exemption, see § 31-205.
This section is referenced in § 47-2608.
1981 Ed., § 47-2609.
1973 Ed., § 47-1807.
Mayor authorized to issue rules: See notes to § 47-2601.